tests/лаша.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах лаша":
    лаша<n><nom> :  лаша 
    лаша<n><gen> :  лашан 
    лаша<n><dat> :  лашана 
    лаша<n><loc> :  лашара 
    лаша<n><abl> :  лашаран 
    лаша<n><ins> :  лашапа 
    лаша<n><abe> :  лашасӑр 
    лаша<n><ben> :  лашашӑн
    лаша<n><px1sg><nom> :  лашам 
    лаша<n><px1sg><gen> :  лашамӑн 
    лаша<n><px1sg><dat> :  лашама 
    лаша<n><px1sg><loc> :  лашамра 
    лаша<n><px1sg><abl> :  лашамран 
    лаша<n><px1sg><ins> :  лашампа 
    лаша<n><px1sg><abe> :  лашамсӑр 
    лаша<n><px1sg><ben> :  лашамшӑн
    лаша<n><px2sg><nom> :  лашу 
    лаша<n><px2sg><gen> :  лашун 
    лаша<n><px2sg><dat> :  лашуна 
    лаша<n><px2sg><loc> :  лашунта 
    лаша<n><px2sg><abl> :  лашунтан 
    лаша<n><px2sg><ins> :  лашупa 
    лаша<n><px2sg><abe> :  лашусӑр 
    лаша<n><px2sg><ben> :  лашушӑн
    лаша<n><px3sp><nom> :  лаши 
    лаша<n><px3sp><gen> :  лашин 
    лаша<n><px3sp><dat> :  лашине 
    лаша<n><px3sp><loc> :  лашинче 
    лаша<n><px3sp><abl> :  лашинчен 
    лаша<n><px3sp><ins> :  лашипе 
    лаша<n><px3sp><abe> :  лашисӗр 
    лаша<n><px3sp><ben> :  лашишӗн
    лаша<n><px1pl><nom> :  лашамӑр 
    лаша<n><px1pl><gen> :  лашамӑрӑн 
    лаша<n><px1pl><dat> :  лашамӑра 
    лаша<n><px1pl><loc> :  лашамӑрта 
    лаша<n><px1pl><abl> :  лашамӑртан 
    лаша<n><px1pl><ins> :  лашамӑрпа 
    лаша<n><px1pl><abe> :  лашамӑрсӑр 
    лаша<n><px1pl><ben> :  лашамӑршӑн
    лаша<n><px2pl><nom> :  лашӑр 
    лаша<n><px2pl><gen> :  лашӑрӑн 
    лаша<n><px2pl><dat> :  лашӑра 
    лаша<n><px2pl><loc> :  лашӑрта 
    лаша<n><px2pl><abl> :  лашӑртан 
    лаша<n><px2pl><ins> :  лашӑрпа 
    лаша<n><px2pl><abe> :  лашӑрсӑр 
    лаша<n><px2pl><ben> :  лашӑршӑн
    лаша<n><pl><nom> :  лашасем 
    лаша<n><pl><gen> :  лашасен 
    лаша<n><pl><dat> :  лашасене 
    лаша<n><pl><loc> :  лашасенче 
    лаша<n><pl><abl> :  лашасенчен 
    лаша<n><pl><ins> :  лашасемпе 
    лаша<n><pl><abe> :  лашасемсӗр 
    лаша<n><pl><ben> :  лашасемшӗн
    лаша<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  лашамсем 
    лаша<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  лашамсен 
    лаша<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  лашамсене 
    лаша<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  лашамсенче 
    лаша<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  лашамсенчен 
    лаша<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  лашамсемпе 
    лаша<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  лашамсемсӗр 
    лаша<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  лашамсемшӗн
    лаша<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  лашусем 
    лаша<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  лашусен 
    лаша<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  лашусене 
    лаша<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  лашусенче 
    лаша<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  лашусенчен 
    лаша<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  лашусемпе 
    лаша<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  лашусемсӗр 
    лаша<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  лашусемшӗн
    лаша<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  лашисем 
    лаша<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  лашисен 
    лаша<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  лашисене 
    лаша<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  лашисенче 
    лаша<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  лашисенчен 
    лаша<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  лашисемпе 
    лаша<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  лашисемсӗр 
    лаша<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  лашисемшӗн
    лаша<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  лашамӑрсем 
    лаша<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  лашамӑрсен 
    лаша<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  лашамӑрсене 
    лаша<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  лашамӑрсенче 
    лаша<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  лашамӑрсенчен 
    лаша<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  лашамӑрсемпе 
    лаша<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  лашамӑрсемсӗр 
    лаша<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  лашамӑрсемшӗн
    лаша<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  лашӑрсем 
    лаша<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  лашӑрсен 
    лаша<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  лашӑрсене 
    лаша<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  лашӑрсенче 
    лаша<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  лашӑрсенчен 
    лаша<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  лашӑрсемпе 
    лаша<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  лашӑрсемсӗр 
    лаша<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  лашӑрсемшӗн
